Illinois, session 104th, SB1396.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by changing 5Section 6-25 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/6-25)7    Sec. 6-25. Additional members. In counties with a board of 8review appointed under Section 6-5, when the county board 9declares by resolution that the number of complaints filed 10with the board of review has created an emergency situation 11and caused a need for an expanded board of review, the chairman 12of the county board may appoint additional qualified members 13to the board of review for the sole purpose of holding separate 14hearings on complaints. The additional members shall not take 15part in the intracounty equalization process of the board of 16review under Section 16-60 or Section 16-65. If a board of 17review is expanded under this Section in Lake, DuPage, 18McHenry, or Kane County, then the chairman of that county 19board may appoint qualified residents of counties that are 20directly adjacent to that chairman's county to serve as 21additional members of the expanded board of review.22(Source: P.A. 96-825, eff. 11-25-09.)   SB1396- 2 -LRB104 02971 HLH 12988 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.